docs/dictionaries/hunspell/russian/nouns.aff
SET UTF-8

WORDCHARS 0123456789’-.

BREAK 0

NOSPLITSUGS
MAXNGRAMSUGS 2
ONLYMAXDIFF
MAXDIFF 0

# блок
SFX B N 10
SFX B 0 а .
SFX B 0 у .
SFX B 0 ом .
SFX B 0 е .
SFX B 0 и [^бвгдзлмнпрстфц]
SFX B 0 ы [бвгдзлмнпрстфц]
SFX B 0 ов .
SFX B 0 ам .
SFX B 0 ами .
SFX B 0 ах .

# краш
SFX C N 9
SFX C 0 а .
SFX C 0 у .
SFX C 0 ем .
SFX C 0 е .
SFX C 0 и .
SFX C 0 ей .
SFX C 0 ам .
SFX C 0 ами .
SFX C 0 ах .

# иннокентий
SFX I N 9
SFX I ий ия .
SFX I ий ию .
SFX I ий ием .
SFX I ий ии .
SFX I ий иев .
SFX I ий иям .
SFX I ий иев .
SFX I ий иями .
SFX I ий иях .

# лодка
SFX L N 7
SFX L а и .
SFX L а е .
SFX L а у .
SFX L а ой .
SFX L а ок .
SFX L а ам .
SFX L а ах .

# весть
SFX V N 5
SFX V сть сти .
SFX V сть стью .
SFX V сть стей .
SFX V сть стями .
SFX V сть стях .

# знание
SFX Z N 8
SFX Z ие ия .
SFX Z ие ию .
SFX Z ие ием .
SFX Z ие ии .
SFX Z ие ий .
SFX Z ие иям .
SFX Z ие иями .
SFX Z ие иях .

# акция
SFX A N 7
SFX A ия ию .
SFX A ия ии .
SFX A ия ией .
SFX A ия ий .
SFX A ия иям .
SFX A ия иями .
SFX A ия иях .

# техписатель
SFX T N 9
SFX T ль ля .
SFX T ль лю .
SFX T ль лем .
SFX T ль ле .
SFX T ль ли .
SFX T ль лей .
SFX T ль лям .
SFX T ль лями .
SFX T ль лях .
