docs/dictionaries/hunspell/russian/nouns.dic
28
автоименование/Z
автонумерация/A
версионирование/Z
виджет/B
инклюд/B
инфоблок/B
кастомизация/A
коммит/B
конфиг/B
лексер/B
мультиязычность/V
офлайн/B
парсинг/B
переиспользование/Z
подпапка/L
подподраздел/B
прототипирование/Z
псевдоселектор/B
рендеринг/B
репозиторий/I
слеш/C
сущность/V
телеграм/B
техписатель/T
хеш/C
хостинг/B
шаблонизатор/B
отрисовка/L
